src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_21_odd_AO

+Sg:                    nom_R           ;
+Sg:                    nom_end         ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
!+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:       par_V           ;
!+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var       par_A           ;
!+Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok       par_A           ;
+Sg:^HMETA              ill_hVVn        ;
+Sg:                    ess_nA          ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    sgpl_cases_odd ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with
!+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    sgpl_cases_odd ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG                 nom_t           ;
!+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG                 nom_t           ;
!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO%>i2          gen_tten        ;
!+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2             gen_tten          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^AO%>i2             par_end         ;


!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^AO%>j              par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
!+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^AO%>j              par_A           ;
+Pl:^AO^HMETA                        ill_hVin        ; ! sykshyin
+Pl:^AO%>i2                          ess_nA          ;
+Pl:^AO%>i2                          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
!+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl






LEXICON n_21_odd_oi  ! For nouns that ends in -o and get special gemination in pl partitive and where only -i is added to the plural stem. We might have to change pl par when we find out is it "perinttöi, perintöitä or perinöitä". 

+N         :  x_21_odd_oi ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_oi

+Sg:                    nom_R           ;
+Sg:                    nom_end         ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:           par_V           ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var       par_A           ;
!+Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok       par_A           ;
+Sg:^HMETA              ill_hVVn        ;
+Sg:                    ess_nnA          ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    sgpl_cases_odd ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    sgpl_cases_odd ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with

+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG              nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG              nom_t           ;
!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO%>i2      gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2       gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2       gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^A0%>i2       par_tA         ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2                 par_end         ;
!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^AO%>j          par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^AO%>i2          par_tA           ;
+Pl:^HMETA                     ill_hVin        ; ! sykshyin
+Pl:%>i2                          ess_nA          ;
+Pl:%>i2                          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl


LEXICON n_21_par_oi  ! For nouns that ends in -o and get special gemination in pl partitive and where only -i is added to the plural stem. We might have to change pl par when we find out is it "perinttöi, perintöitä or perinöitä". 

+N         :  x_21_par_oi ;

LEXICON x_21_par_oi

+Sg:                    nom_R           ;
+Sg:                    nom_end         ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    gen_n_sg        ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:           par_V           ;
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var       par_A           ;
!+Sg+Dial/Jok:^Jok       par_A           ;
+Sg:^HMETA              ill_hVVn        ;
+Sg:                    ess_nnA          ;
+Sg+Dial/Por:^Por^WG    sgpl_cases_even ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with
+Sg+Dial/Var:^Var^WG    sgpl_cases_even ; !to sgpl_cases_even for cases with

+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG              nom_t           ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG              nom_t           ;
!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^WG^AO%>i2      gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2       gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^AO%>i2       gen_tten        ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG^A0%>i2       par_tA         ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2                 par_end         ;
!+Pl+Dial/Jok:^Jok^AO%>j          par_A           ; ! Use i:j in twolc j, see below
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^AO%>i2          par_tA           ;
+Pl:^HMETA                     ill_hVin        ; ! sykshyin
+Pl:%>i2                          ess_nA          ;
+Pl:%>i2                          com_ne          ;
+Pl+Dial/Por:^Por^WG%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl
+Pl+Dial/Var:^Var^WG^AO%>i2          sgpl_cases_even ; !the same affix in sg and pl



LEXICON n_21_odd_C !!= * @CODE@ lainasanat, fiction
+N+Sg: nom_end ;
+N:i x_21_odd_i_oblique ;

LEXICON n_21_odd_i !!= * @CODE@  meininki, tunturi TODO
+N         :     x_21_odd_i ;
+N+Sg      :     nom_R       ;
+N+Sg      :^WG  gen_n    ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_i
  +Sg      :        nom_end               ;
  x_21_odd_i_oblique ;

LEXICON x_21_odd_i_oblique
  +Sg      :^WG     gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:        par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:        par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:        par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA  ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :        ess_nnA         ;
  +Sg      :^WG     sgpl_cases_odd  ;

  +Pl      :^WG     nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG%>i2 gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        par_A           ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA  ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        ess_nnA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        ess_nnA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        com_nne         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        com_nne         ;

  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG%>i2 sgpl_cases_even ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>   sgpl_cases_odd  ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>   sgpl_cases_odd  ; ! Adding  to block i:0

!  Tarkista, onko yaml oikein:
!  [24/25][FAIL] meininki+N+Pl+Ess => Missing results: meininkiinä
!  [24/25][FAIL] meininki+N+Pl+Ess => Unexpected results: meininkkiinä
!  [25/25][FAIL] meininki+N+Pl+Com => Missing results: meininkiine
!  [25/25][FAIL] meininki+N+Pl+Com => Unexpected results: meininkkiine

LEXICON n_21_even_i !kommentaari, even tavut 
+N+Sg: nom_end ;
+N: x_21_even_i ;

LEXICON x_21_even_i 
  +Sg      :^WG     gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg+Dial/Por:        par_V           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Jok:        par_A           ;
  +Sg+Dial/Var:        par_A           ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA  ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :        ess_nA         ;
  +Sg      :^WG     sgpl_cases_even  ;

  +Pl      :^WG     nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG%>i2 gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG     gen_tten        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    par_tA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        par_A           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        par_A           ;
  +Pl      :^HMETA  ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    ess_nA          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        ess_nA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        ess_nA         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2    com_ne          ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:        com_ne         ;
  +Pl+Dial/Var:        com_ne         ;

  +Pl+Dial/Por:^WG%>i2 sgpl_cases_even ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:^WG%>   sgpl_cases_even  ; ! Adding  to block i:0
  +Pl+Dial/Var:^WG%>   sgpl_cases_even  ; ! Adding  to block i:0



LEXICON n_21_oi        !!= * @CODE@  Paivukko, perintö, kurkkio
! They differ from n_21_odd_oi in pl par
+N         : x_21_oi ;
