src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
ornitoloogi:ornitoloogi n_21_odd_i ;
spesiaaliputiikki:spesiaali#putiikki n_21_odd_i ;
fysikki:fysikki n_21_odd_i ;
mellinki:mellinki n_21_odd_i ;
camping:camping n_21_odd_C ;
timing:timing n_21_odd_C ;
kevitysoorninki:kevitys#oorninki n_21_odd_i ;
promoteerinki:promoteerinki n_21_odd_i ;
pytinki:pytinki n_21_odd_i ;
pokaali:pokaali n_21_odd_i ;
manttaali:manttaali n_21_odd_i ;
krinkeli:krinkeli n_21_odd_i ;
ääniseteli:ääni#seteli n_21_odd_i ;
lekseemi+Err/Orth:leksemi n_21_odd_i ;
metoodi:metoodi n_21_odd_i ;
programi+Err/Orth:prugrammi n_21_odd_i ;
raadio-observatooriumi+Err/Orth:raatio-#observatooriumi n_21_odd_i ;
fonteeni:fonteeni n_21_odd_i ;
kruuvasamfynni:kruuva#samfynni n_21_odd_i ;
trombooni:trombooni n_21_odd_i ;
deklarasuuni:deklarasuuni n_21_odd_i ;
auksuuni:auksuuni n_21_odd_i ;
vahtistasuuni:vahti#stasuuni n_21_odd_i ;
työtitteli:työ#titteli n_21_odd_i ;
kommentaari:kommentaari n_21_even_i ;
akkari:akkari n_21_odd_i ;
kunttipillari:kunttipillari n_21_odd_i ;
muurari:muurari n_21_odd_i ;
äänidesign:ääni#design n_21_odd_C ;
valodesign:valo#design n_21_odd_C ;
kliivertti:kliivertti n_21_odd_i ;
laakeri:laakeri n_21_odd_i ;
kynteri:kynteri n_21_odd_i ;
kubikkimeetteri:kubikki#meetteri n_21_odd_i ;
vesiskuutteri:vesi#skuutteri n_21_odd_i ;
tohturi:tohturi n_21_odd_i ;
brosyyri:brosyyri n_21_odd_i ;
refleksi:refleksi n_21_odd_i ;
sylfiiti:sylfiiti n_21_odd_i ;
revolusuuni:revolusuuni n_21_odd_i ;
diskeetti:diskeetti n_21_odd_i ;
steinpiitti:steinpiitti n_21_odd_i ;
rekrytti:rekrytti n_21_odd_i ;
fiction:fiction n_21_odd_C ;
poulakko:poulakko n_21_oi ;
lammikko:lammikko n_21_oi ;
sammakko:sammakko n_21_oi ;
rapakko:rapakko n_21_oi ;
evakko:evakko n_21_oi ;
puistikko:puistikko n_21_oi ;
aalokko:aalokko n_21_oi ;
haulikko:haulikko n_21_oi ;
palmikko:palmikko n_21_oi ;
nurmikko:nurmikko n_21_oi ;
ulkorannikko:ulko#rannikko n_21_oi ;
pounikko:pounikko n_21_oi ;
tarikko:tarikko n_21_oi ;
vittikko:vittikko n_21_oi ;
koivikko:koivikko n_21_oi ;
luođikko:luođikko n_21_oi ;
pajukko:pajukko n_21_oi ;
koijukko:koijukko n_21_oi ;
paivukko:paivukko n_21_oi ;
alanko:alanko n_21_oi ;
vahinko:vahinko n_21_oi ;
keskiyönaurinko:keski#yön#aurinko n_21_oi ;
lehmänhinkalo:lehmän#hinkalo n_21_oi ;
kahmalo:kahmalo n_21_oi ;
karpalo:karpalo n_21_oi ;
koppelo:koppelo n_21_oi ;
valamo:valamo n_21_oi ;
tolpano:tolpano n_21_oi ;
puunakartano:puuna#kartano n_21_oi ;
kukkaro:kukkaro n_21_oi ;
mobiilinumero:mobiili#numero n_21_oi ;
syntymänumero:syntymä#numero n_21_oi ;
pusero:pusero n_21_oi ;
asunto:asunto n_21_odd_oi ;
lausunto:lausunto n_21_odd_oi ;
jokisuvanto:joki#suvanto n_21_odd_oi ;
uimasuvanto:uima#suvanto n_21_odd_oi ;
lämminvesisuvanto:lämmin#vesi#suvanto n_21_odd_oi ;
avento:avento n_21_odd_oi ;
elanto:elanto n_21_odd_oi ;
kattanto:kattanto n_21_odd_oi ;
suvanto:suvanto n_21_odd_oi ;
suvanto+Err/Orth:suanto n_21_odd_oi ;
olento:olento n_21_odd_oi ;
komento:komento n_21_odd_oi ;
pitkäsenkorento:pitkäsen#korento n_21_odd_oi ;
pitkäsenkorento+Err/Orth:pitkesen#korento n_21_odd_oi ;
pitkänkorento:pitkän#korento n_21_odd_oi ;
korento:korento n_21_odd_oi ;
poronkurento:poron#kurento n_21_odd_oi ;
kurento:kurento n_21_odd_oi ;
ahvento:ahvento n_21_odd_oi ;
sansihavainto:sansi#havainto n_21_odd_oi ;
kulttuuripalkinto:kulttuuri#palkinto n_21_odd_oi ;
palkinto:palkinto n_21_odd_oi ;
maasteriopinto:maasteri#opinto n_21_odd_oi ;
opinto:opinto n_21_odd_oi ;
sovinto:sovinto n_21_odd_oi ;
marasto:marasto n_21_odd_oi ;
kasutusosasto:kasutus#osasto n_21_odd_oi ;
kommunikasuuniosasto:kommunikasuuni#osasto n_21_odd_oi ;
lastensuojeluosasto:lastensuojelu#osasto n_21_odd_oi ;
oikkeusosasto:oikkeus#osasto n_21_odd_oi ;
poronhoito-osasto:poronhoito-#osasto n_21_odd_oi ;
tervheysosasto:tervheys#osasto n_21_odd_oi ;
opiskelliijaverkosto:opiskelliija#verkosto n_21_odd_oi ;
verkosto:verkosto n_21_odd_oi ;
putkisto:putkisto n_21_oi ;
preesens:preesens n_21_odd_C ;
pötäjikkö:pötäjikkö n_21_par_oi ;
distriktinpäälikkö:distriktin#päälikkö n_21_oi ;
heinikkö:heinikkö n_21_oi ;
jäätikkö:jäätikkö n_21_oi ;
käyläkkö:käyläkkö n_21_oi ;
käytäntö:käytäntö n_21_odd_oi ;
kulttuuriperintö:kulttuuri#perintö n_21_odd_oi ;
perintö:perintö n_21_odd_oi ;
järjestö:järjestö n_21_odd_oi ;
väjestö:väjestö n_21_odd_oi ;
enämistö:enämistö n_21_par_oi ;
vähemistö:vähemistö n_21_par_oi ;
ympäristö:ympäristö n_21_par_oi ;
